North Carolina, session 2025, SB817.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described territory is added to the corporate limits of
the City of Jacksonville:
Marine Corps Base Camp Lejeune
Beginning at the intersection of the southern right of way line of NC Highway 24 and the
centerline of the Camp Lejeune Railroad;
Thence leaving said right of way and following the centerline of said Camp Lejeune Railroad
in a southernly direction for approximately 3,600 feet to the intersection of the Camp Lejeune
Railroad and the centerline of the mainline of the Camp Lejeune Railroad to a point;
Thence along the mainline of the Camp Lejeune Railroad, paralleling Holcomb Boulevard in
a southeasterly and southerly direction for a distance of approximately 13,200 feet to the point
of intersection of the centerline of Sneads Ferry Road and the centerline of the Camp Lejeune
Railroad;
Thence following the centerline of the Sneads Ferry Road in a southeasterly direction
approximately 17,700 feet to the intersection of said road and the high water mark of southern
bank of Cowhead Creek;
Thence following the southern high water mark of Cowhead Creek approximately 5,600 feet
in a westerly direction to its junction with French's Creek (also known as Frenchman's Creek);
Thence along the southern high water mark of French's Creek in a northerly and westerly
direction approximately 8,300 feet to the monument known as "French" (North Carolina State
Plane Coordinates X = 2,498,523.47, Y = 326,128.67);
Thence heading in a southerly direction towards New River Inlet where Camp Lejeune
crosses the Atlantic Intercoastal Waterway to the southern tip of Onslow Beach where the New
River meets the Atlantic Ocean (New River Inlet);
Thence heading in a northeasterly direction for approximately 54,800 feet to Sanders
Channel;
Thence heading southwesterly and then turning northerly where the boundary crosses the
Atlantic Intercoastal Waterway following the western boundary of Bear Creek until it meets Bear
Creek Road;
Thence following the southern right of way boundary of Bear Creek Road until it meets NC
Highway 172;
*S817-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Thence following the western right of way boundary of NC Highway 172 in a northerly
direction for approximately 20,350 feet until it intersects Starling Road;
Thence following the southern right of way of Starling Road in a westerly direction for
approximately 1,735 feet until this meets the southern right of way of NC Highway 24;
Thence following the southern right of way of NC Highway 24 in a westerly direction for
approximately 27,815 feet until it intersects with the beginning point and only containing those
parcels/land owned by the United States of America.
Marine Corps Base Camp LeJeune – Greater Sandy Run Training Area
Beginning at the southwest right of way corner at the intersection of US Highway 17 and
High Hill Road;
Thence following the western boundary of US Highway 17 in a southerly direction to NC
highway 50;
Thence following the eastern boundary of NC Highway 50 in a northwesterly direction to
Padgett Road;
Thence following the southern boundary of Padgett Road to the intersection of Haws Run
Road;
Thence following the southern boundary of Haws Run Road in an easterly direction to
intersection of Dawsons Cabin Road;
Thence following the southern right of way boundary of Dawsons Cabin Road to High Hill
Road;
Thence following the western right of way boundary of High Hill Road in a southerly
direction to the beginning point and only containing those parcels/land owned by the United
States of America.
Marine Corps Air Station New River, Marine Corps Special Operations Command at Stones
Bay and the New River
Beginning at the monument "Jarman" located at New River Air Station at the junction of
Southwest Creek with New River (NC Plane Coordinates X= 2,472,581.66, Y= 348,526.23);
Thence up the northern or main channel of Southwest Creek in a southerly and then
northwesterly direction to the junction of the said creek with Rhodes Creek at a point immediately
northwest of the old Atlantic Coast Line Railroad (New Bern Branch);
Thence up the meanders of Rhodes Creek and Richardson Branch in a northwesterly direction
to its intersection with the eastern right of way line of US Highway 17;
Thence heading in a southerly direction following the eastern right of way boundary of US
Highway 17 for approximately 42,970 feet to the northern corner point of PAR ID 028458 (Tax
map parcel 757-9);
Thence heading in a southerly direction for approximately 960 feet towards the southeastern
most corner point of PAR ID 058282 (Tax map parcel 757-9.1) which intersects with NC
Highway 210 Right of way;
Thence following in an easterly direction the northern right of way boundary of NC Highway
210 for approximately 14,601 feet to the northwest corner point of PAR ID 041004 (Tax map
parcel 765-62.18);
Thence following the northwestern property boundary in a northeasterly direction to
northeastern corner point of PAR ID 041004 where it abuts Everett Creek for approximately
6,090 feet;
Thence following Everett Creek in a southeasterly direction until it meets the New River;
Thence following the New River towards the NC Highway 172 Bridge in a northeasterly
direction;
Thence following the centerline of NC Highway 172 to Pollocks Point;
Thence following the New River in a northerly direction towards Jacksonville to the
monument known as "French" (North Carolina State Plane Coordinates X = 2,498,523.47, Y =
326,128.67);
Page 2 Senate Bill 817-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Thence approximately 17,908 feet to Monument "371 USMC" located on Hadnot Point
(Hospital Point) (NC Plane Coordinates X = 2,487,613.10, Y = 340,329.81);
Thence north approximately 13,959 feet to the monument "Paradise Eccentric" located at
Paradise Point (NC Plane Coordinates X = 2,482,316.56, Y = 353,245.56);
Thence crossing New River South approximately 10,819 feet to the beginning point,
monument "Jarman" located at New River Air Station at the junction of Southwest Creek with
New River (NC Plane Coordinates X = 2,472,581.66, Y = 348,526.23).
SECTION 2. This act shall not create or increase any right for a city to regulate or
otherwise influence activities of the federal government or any activities and operations
occurring in or on Marine Corps Base Camp Lejeune, Marine Corps Air Station New River, or
Marine Corps Special Operations Command at Stones Bay and the New River.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2026. To the extent permitted
under State and federal law, property in the territory described by Section 1 of this act as of
January 1, 2026, is subject to municipal taxes for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 817-First Edition Page 3